Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER 667

FORECLOSURES

Part I. General
Provisions

Section

667-1 Definitions

Part IA. Foreclosure by
Action

667-1.5 Foreclosure by action

667-2 Other mortgagees joined

667-3 Proceeds, how applied

667-4 Defenses

667-5 Repealed

667-5.5 Foreclosure notice;
planned communities;

condominiums;
cooperative housing projects

667-5.7 to 8 Repealed

667-9 Dower barred, when

667-10 Power unaffected by
transfer; surplus after sale

667-11 to 15 Repealed

667-17 Attorney affirmation in
judicial foreclosure

667-18 Attorney affirmation in
judicial foreclosure

667-19 Association
foreclosures; cure of default; payment plan

667-20 Publication of notice of
public sale

667-20.1 Postponement, cancellation of sale

Part II. Power of Sale
Foreclosure Process

667-21 Power of sale process

667-21.5 Foreclosure notice;
planned communities;

condominiums;
cooperative housing projects

667-21.6 Repealed

667-22 Notice of default and
intention to foreclose;

contents; distribution

667-23 Recordation of notice of
default and intention

to foreclose

667-24 Cure of default

667-25 Date, place of public
sale of mortgaged property

667-26 Repealed

667-27 Public notice of public
sale; contents; distribution;

publication

667-28 Postponement,
cancellation of sale

667-29 Authorized bidder;
successful bidder

667-30 Successful bidder's
failure to comply; forfeiture of

downpayment

667-31 Conveyance of property
on payment of purchase price;

distribution of sale
proceeds

667-32 Affidavit after public
sale; contents

667-33 Recordation of
affidavit, conveyance document; effect

667-34, 35 Repealed

667-36 Sale of property separately

667-37 Judicial action of
foreclosure before public sale

667-38 Deficiency judgment
against owner-occupant prohibited

667-39 Right to enforce this
part

667-40 Use of power of sale
foreclosure in certain

non-mortgage situations

667-41 Public information
notice requirement

667-42 Repealed

Part III. Other
Provisions

667-50 Repealed

667-51 Appeals

667-52
Buyer's choice of title insurer and escrow agent

667-53 Conversion to judicial
foreclosure; residential

property; conditions

667-54 Petition for conversion;
residential property;

Required contents

667-55 Notice of default and
intention to foreclose;

residential property;
required statement on

conversion

667-56 Prohibited conduct

667-57 Suspension of
foreclosure actions by junior

lienholders

667-58 Valid notice;
affiliate statement

667-59 Actions and
communications with the mortgagor

in connection with a
foreclosure

667-60 Unfair or deceptive act
or practice; transfer of title

Part IV. Time Share
Interest Foreclosures

667-61 Repealed

667-62 Time share interest
foreclosure under power of

sale; notice; affidavit after sale

667-63 Notice to mortgage
creditors

667-64 Affidavit as evidence

667-65 Application of time
share interest power of sale

requirements

Part
V. Mortgage Foreclosure Dispute Resolution

667-71 Applicability

667-72 Repealed

667-73 Mortgage foreclosure
dispute resolution program;

administration

667-74 Availability of dispute
resolution required before

foreclosure

667-75 Notice of dispute
resolution availability required

667-76 Mortgagee's filing of
notice with department;

filing fee; electronic
public notice of public sale

667-77
Notification to mortgagor by department

667-78
Owner-occupant's election of dispute resolution;

owner-occupant program
fee; right to dispute

resolution waived

667-79
Notification of opening a dispute resolution case;

mortgagee's program fee

667-80 Parties; requirements; process

667-81 Outcome of dispute resolution; neutral's closing

report

667-82
Noncompliance with requirements; statement

667-83 Stay of nonjudicial foreclosure proceedings

667-84 Confidentiality

667-85
Neutral qualifications; status and liability

667-86 Mortgage foreclosure
dispute resolution special fund

Part VI. Association
Alternate Power of Sale

Foreclosure
Process

667-91 Alternate power of sale
process

667-92 Notice of default and
intention to foreclose;

contents; distribution;
alternative remedies for

failure to serve

667-93 Recordation of notice of
default and intention to

foreclose

667-94 Cure of default

667-95 Date of public sale of
unit; place of sale

667-96 Public notice of public
sale; contents; distribution;

publication

667-97 Postponement,
cancellation of sale

667-98 Authorized bidder;
successful bidder

667-99 Successful bidder's
failure to comply; forfeiture of

downpayment

667-100 Conveyance of property
on payment of purchase price;

distribution of sale
proceeds

667-101 Affidavit after public
sale; contents

667-102 Recordation of
affidavit, conveyance document; effect

667-103 Recordation; full
satisfaction of debt by unit owner

667-104 Prohibited conduct

Note

As to procedural statutes superseded by the rules of court,
see note preceding Title 32.

Chapter heading amended by L 2012, c 182, §3(4).

Cross References

Mortgage rescue fraud prevention act, see chapter 480E.

Secure and fair enforcement for mortgage licensing act, see
chapter 454F.

Rules of Court

See Rules for Conversion of Non-Judicial Foreclosure
Proceedings.

Law Journals and Reviews

Timesharing in the 1990s. I HBJ, no. 13, at 89 (1997).

Case Notes

Defendant's motion for summary judgment granted on count
alleging violation of this chapter, where plaintiffs did not establish a
genuine issue of material fact regarding the claim and further failed to state
a claim for wrongful foreclosure. 907 F. Supp. 2d 1165 (2012).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next